District of Columbia statutes.
26-1161.05

Confidential information.

To assist in the performance of the Commissioner’s duties under this chapter, the Commissioner may:

(1)

Share documents, materials, or other information, including confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information subject to this chapter, with state, federal, and international regulatory agencies and law enforcement authorities, and with the CSBS, SRR, and NMLS, or their affiliates or subsidiaries; provided, that the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the documents, materials, or other information;

(2)

Receive documents, materials, or information, including confidential and privileged documents, materials, or other information, from state, federal, and international regulatory agencies or law enforcement authorities or from the CSBS, SRR, and NMLS or their affiliates or subsidiaries, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any documents, materials, or other information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the documents, materials, or other information;

(3)

Enter into agreements for sharing and using confidential information consistent with this chapter;

(4)

Authorize a national criminal background check and submission of fingerprints and other identifying information submitted through the NMLS and receive criminal history record information from the NMLS, the Metropolitan Police Department, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purposes of facilitating determinations regarding eligibility for licensure or registration under the Banking Code; and

(5)

Contract with a third party, including the SRR, or the CSBS, or their affiliates or subsidiaries, to perform any functions, including the collection of licensing, registration, and processing fees, collection of contact information and other identifying information, fingerprints, written consent to a criminal background check, personal history and experience, and conduct of examinations-related activities covered under the Banking Code, that the Commissioner may consider appropriate.

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-172, § 6, 61 DCR 12577